Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 37.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20101-167
Unlawful use of terms; advertising;
prima facie evidence of violation.

The display or uttering
by a person of a card, sign, advertisement, or other printed, engraved, or
written instrument or device, bearing a person's name in conjunction with
the words certified public accountant or any abbreviation thereof or public
accountant or any abbreviation thereof shall be prima facie evidence in any
action brought under section 1-165 or 1-166 that the person whose name is
so displayed caused or procured the display or uttering of such card, sign,
advertisement, or other printed, engraved, or written instrument or device
and that such person is holding himself or herself out to be a certified public
accountant holding
a permit issued under section 1-136. In any such action evidence of the commission
of a single act prohibited by the Public Accountancy Act shall be sufficient
to justify an injunction or a conviction without evidence of a general course
of conduct.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 62, p. 77;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 61;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 37.